Utah statutes.
59-13-308.   Delinquency -- Penalties -- Interest.
If any user becomes delinquent in tax payments under this part, all licenses
or permits issued under this part are automatically revoked.  In addition, the
commission shall impose a penalty determined under Section 59-1-401.  The
amount of the delinquent tax and the penalty shall bear interest at the rate
and in the manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402.
